Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2018
Solid waste management hierarchy; established; cooperative program; established.

(1) An effective and efficient program of integrated solid waste management protects the environment and the public and provides the most practical and beneficial use of the solid waste material. While recognizing the continuing necessity for the existence of landfills, alternative methods of managing solid waste and a reduction in the reliance upon land disposal of solid waste are encouraged. In the promotion of these goals, the following solid waste management hierarchy, in descending order of preference, is established as the integrated solid waste management policy of the state:

(a) Volume reduction at the source;

(b) Recycling, reuse, and vegetative waste composting;

(c) Land disposal;

(d) Incineration with energy resource recovery; and

(e) Incineration for volume reduction.

(2) In the implementation of the integrated solid waste management policy, the state shall establish and maintain a cooperative state and local program of project planning and technical assistance to encourage integrated solid waste management.

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 18.